Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1261] DISABILITY RIGHTS AND SUPPORT PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue disability rights and support special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, along with any other fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $30 annually to the disability rights and support account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin In consultation with interested groups involved in services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, the commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the inscription "Disability Rights since 1950." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited in the disability rights and support account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of public safety. This appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account funds, and the remaining money is for distribution to the nonprofit organization The Arc Minnesota to further its mission and activities related to disability community support, including direct supports for individuals with a disability. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end